Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-301
Power and duty of political subdivisions.

Any county, precinct, township or town, city, village or school district is hereby authorized and required to compromise its indebtedness in the manner hereinafter provided.

Laws 1903, c. 10, § 1, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 400;

C.S.1922, § 317;

C.S.1929, § 11-301;

R.S.1943, § 10-301.